Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.301

Application—Subchapter heading.

(1) RCW 19.28.311 through 19.28.381 apply throughout this chapter.

(2) RCW 19.28.311 through 19.28.381 constitute the subchapter "provisions applicable to electrical installations and telecommunications installations."

[ 2000 c 238 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2000 c 238 s 301.]